Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.190

Proceedings and report of referee.

The referee shall receive the evidence and report the names of the creditors whose liens are established, the amounts due thereon, or secured thereby, and their priority respectively, and whether contingent or absolute. He or she shall attach to his or her report the proof of service of the notices and the evidence before him or her.

[ 2011 c 336 s 226; Code 1881 s 570; 1877 p 120 s 573; 1869 p 136 s 523; RRS s 856.]